Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-140
Duration of lien; demand to institute judicial proceedings; continuation of lien during pendency of proceeding.

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, a lien that has become enforceable as provided in sections 52-125 to 52-159 continues enforceable for two years after recording of the lien.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, if an owner, holder of a security interest, or other person having an interest in the real estate gives the claimant written demand to institute a judicial proceeding within thirty days, the lien lapses unless within thirty days after receipt of the written demand, the claimant institutes judicial proceedings or records an affidavit that the total contract price is not yet due under the contract for which he or she recorded the lien.

(3) If a judicial proceeding to enforce a lien is instituted while a lien is effective under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the lien continues during the pendency of the proceeding.

Laws 1981, LB 512, § 16.